Hawaii statutes.
§6E-8 Review of effect of proposed
state projects. (a) Before any agency or officer of the State or its
political subdivisions commences any project which may affect historic
property, aviation artifact, or a burial site, the agency or officer shall advise
the department and allow the department an opportunity for review of the effect
of the proposed project on historic properties, aviation artifacts, or burial
sites, consistent with section 6E-43, especially those listed on the Hawaii
register of historic places. The proposed project shall not be commenced, or
if it has already begun, continued, until the department has given its written
concurrence. If:

(1) The proposed project consists of corridors or
large land areas;

(2) Access to properties is restricted; or

(3) Circumstances dictate that construction be done
in stages,

the department may give its written concurrence
based on a phased review of the project; provided that there shall be a
programmatic agreement between the department and the project applicant that
identifies each phase and the estimated timelines for each phase.

The department shall provide written
concurrence or non-concurrence within ninety days after the filing of a request
with the department. The agency or officer seeking to proceed with the
project, or any person, may appeal the department's concurrence or
non-concurrence to the Hawaii historic places review board. An agency,
officer, or other person who is dissatisfied with the decision of the review
board may apply to the governor, who may take action as the governor deems best
in overruling or sustaining the department.

(b) The department of Hawaiian home lands,
prior to any proposed project relating to lands under its jurisdiction, shall
consult with the department regarding the effect of the project upon historic
property or a burial site.

(c) The State, its political subdivisions,
agencies, and officers shall report to the department the finding of any
historic property during any project and shall cooperate with the department in
the investigation, recording, preservation, and salvage of the property.

(d) The department shall adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 91 to implement this section. [L 1976, c 104, pt of §2;
gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 306, §7; am L 1995, c 187, §2; am L 1996, c 13, §1
and c 97, §7; am L 2008, c 228, §2; am L 2009, c 4, §2; am L 2013, c 85, §2]

Case Notes

Where rules implementing this section and §6E-42 required
that historic properties be identified in the "project area", and the
broad definition of "project area" contained in the rules encompassed
the entire rail project, the rules did not permit the state historic
preservation division (SHPD) to concur in the rail project absent a completed
archeological inventory survey (AIS) for the entire project area; because an
AIS was not completed before the SHPD gave its concurrence in the project, the
SHPD's concurrence in and the city's commencement of the project were improper.
128 H. 53, 283 P.3d 60 (2012).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next